Utah statutes.
63A-2-409.   Disposal of certain surplus property.

This part does not apply to disposition by:

(1)  the legislative branch of surplus property that is information technology equipment or a personal handheld electronic device, if the Legislative Management Committee, by rule, establishes its own policy for disposition, by the legislative branch, of surplus property that is information technology equipment or a personal handheld electronic device; or

(2)  the Department of Transportation of surplus personal property that was acquired as part of a transaction or legal action by the Department of Transportation acquiring real property for a state transportation purpose.



Amended by Chapter 15, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 151, 2013 General Session

